Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-318 Collateral loans. An
insurer is permitted to loan its funds upon the pledge of securities or
evidences of debt eligible for investment under this article. As at date made,
no such loan shall exceed in amount ninety per cent of the fair value of the
collateral pledged, except that loans upon pledge of United States government
bonds may be equal to the fair value of the bonds pledged and that loans on
life insurance policies may equal the cash surrender value of the policy as
provided in section 431:6-314. The amount so loaned shall be included in the
maximum percentage of funds permitted to be invested in the kinds of securities
for evidences of debt pledged or permitted by section 431:6-105. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next